Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1048
Public grazing funds; distribution.

The county treasurer shall, within twenty days after receiving the apportionment under section 79-1047, distribute the funds to the school districts in the county from which the public grazing funds were derived in proportion to the respective acreage of grazing lands in each district within the county.

Laws 1947, c. 300, § 2, p. 917;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2014;

Laws 1949, c. 266, § 1, p. 880;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 388, p. 822;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1313;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 694;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 103.